Utah statutes.
32B-12-203.   Renewal requirements for liquor warehousing license.

(1)  A liquor warehousing license expires on December 31 of each year.

(2)  To renew a liquor warehousing license, a person shall submit to the department by no later than November 30 of the year the license expires:

(a)  a completed renewal application in a form prescribed by the department; and

(b)  a renewal fee of $1,200.

(3)  Failure to meet the renewal requirements results in an automatic forfeiture of the liquor warehousing license effective on the date the existing liquor warehousing license expires.



Amended by Chapter 334, 2011 General Session

